Illinois, session 104th, SB2723.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Gambling Act is amended by 5changing Section 7 as follows: 6    (230 ILCS 10/7)  (from Ch. 120, par. 2407)7    Sec. 7. Owners licenses. 8    (a) The Board shall issue owners licenses to persons or 9entities that apply for such licenses upon payment to the 10Board of the non-refundable license fee as provided in 11subsection (e) or (e-5) and upon a determination by the Board 12that the applicant is eligible for an owners license pursuant 13to this Act and the rules of the Board. From December 15, 2008 14(the effective date of Public Act 95-1008) until (i) 3 years 15after December 15, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 1695-1008), (ii) the date any organization licensee begins to 17operate a slot machine or video game of chance under the 18Illinois Horse Racing Act of 1975 or this Act, (iii) the date 19that payments begin under subsection (c-5) of Section 13 of 20this Act, (iv) the wagering tax imposed under Section 13 of 21this Act is increased by law to reflect a tax rate that is at 22least as stringent or more stringent than the tax rate 23contained in subsection (a-3) of Section 13, or (v) when an   SB2723- 2 -LRB104 15890 LNS 29116 b1owners licensee holding a license issued pursuant to Section 27.1 of this Act begins conducting gaming, whichever occurs 3first, as a condition of licensure and as an alternative 4source of payment for those funds payable under subsection 5(c-5) of Section 13 of this Act, any owners licensee that holds 6or receives its owners license on or after May 26, 2006 (the 7effective date of Public Act 94-804), other than an owners 8licensee operating a riverboat with adjusted gross receipts in 9calendar year 2004 of less than $200,000,000, must pay into 10the Horse Racing Equity Trust Fund, in addition to any other 11payments required under this Act, an amount equal to 3% of the 12adjusted gross receipts received by the owners licensee. The 13payments required under this Section shall be made by the 14owners licensee to the State Treasurer no later than 3:00 15o'clock p.m. of the day after the day when the adjusted gross 16receipts were received by the owners licensee. A person or 17entity is ineligible to receive an owners license if:18        (1) the person has been convicted of a felony under 19    the laws of this State, any other state, or the United 20    States;21        (2) the person has been convicted of any violation of 22    Article 28 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal 23    Code of 2012, or substantially similar laws of any other 24    jurisdiction;25        (3) the person has submitted an application for a 26    license under this Act which contains false information;  SB2723- 3 -LRB104 15890 LNS 29116 b1        (4) the person is a member of the Board;2        (5) a person defined in (1), (2), (3), or (4) is an 3    officer, director, or managerial employee of the entity;4        (6) the entity employs a person defined in (1), (2), 5    (3), or (4) who participates in the management or 6    operation of gambling operations authorized under this 7    Act;8        (7) (blank); or9        (8) a license of the person or entity issued under 10    this Act, or a license to own or operate gambling 11    facilities in any other jurisdiction, has been revoked.12    The Board is expressly prohibited from making changes to 13the requirement that licensees make payment into the Horse 14Racing Equity Trust Fund without the express authority of the 15Illinois General Assembly and making any other rule to 16implement or interpret Public Act 95-1008. For the purposes of 17this paragraph, "rules" is given the meaning given to that 18term in Section 1-70 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 19Act.20    (b) In determining whether to grant an owners license to 21an applicant, the Board shall consider:22        (1) the character, reputation, experience, and 23    financial integrity of the applicants and of any other or 24    separate person that either:25            (A) controls, directly or indirectly, such 26        applicant; or  SB2723- 4 -LRB104 15890 LNS 29116 b1            (B) is controlled, directly or indirectly, by such 2        applicant or by a person which controls, directly or 3        indirectly, such applicant;4        (2) the facilities or proposed facilities for the 5    conduct of gambling;6        (3) the highest prospective total revenue to be 7    derived by the State from the conduct of gambling;8        (4) the extent to which the ownership of the applicant 9    reflects the diversity of the State by including minority 10    persons, women, and persons with a disability and the good 11    faith affirmative action plan of each applicant to 12    recruit, train, and upgrade minority persons, women, and 13    persons with a disability in all employment 14    classifications; the Board shall further consider granting 15    an owners license and giving preference to an applicant 16    under this Section to applicants in which minority persons 17    and women hold ownership interest of at least 16% and 4%, 18    respectively; 19        (4.5) the extent to which the ownership of the 20    applicant includes veterans of service in the armed forces 21    of the United States, and the good faith affirmative 22    action plan of each applicant to recruit, train, and 23    upgrade veterans of service in the armed forces of the 24    United States in all employment classifications; 25        (5) the financial ability of the applicant to purchase 26    and maintain adequate liability and casualty insurance;  SB2723- 5 -LRB104 15890 LNS 29116 b1        (6) whether the applicant has adequate capitalization 2    to provide and maintain, for the duration of a license, a 3    riverboat or casino;4        (7) the extent to which the applicant exceeds or meets 5    other standards for the issuance of an owners license 6    which the Board may adopt by rule; 7        (8) the amount of the applicant's license bid;8        (9) the extent to which the applicant or the proposed 9    host municipality plans to enter into revenue sharing 10    agreements with communities other than the host 11    municipality;12        (10) the extent to which the ownership of an applicant 13    includes the most qualified number of minority persons, 14    women, and persons with a disability; and15        (11) whether the applicant has entered into a fully 16    executed construction project labor agreement with the 17    applicable local building trades council.18    (c) Each owners license shall specify the place where the 19casino shall operate or the riverboat shall operate and dock.20    (d) Each applicant shall submit with his or her 21application, on forms provided by the Board, 2 sets of his or 22her fingerprints.23    (e) In addition to any licenses authorized under 24subsection (e-5) of this Section, the Board may issue up to 10 25licenses authorizing the holders of such licenses to own 26riverboats. In the application for an owners license, the   SB2723- 6 -LRB104 15890 LNS 29116 b1applicant shall state the dock at which the riverboat is based 2and the water on which the riverboat will be located. The Board 3shall issue 5 licenses to become effective not earlier than 4January 1, 1991. Three of such licenses shall authorize 5riverboat gambling on the Mississippi River, or, with approval 6by the municipality in which the riverboat was docked on 7August 7, 2003 and with Board approval, be authorized to 8relocate to a new location, in a municipality that (1) borders 9on the Mississippi River or is within 5 miles of the city 10limits of a municipality that borders on the Mississippi River 11and (2) on August 7, 2003, had a riverboat conducting 12riverboat gambling operations pursuant to a license issued 13under this Act; one of which shall authorize riverboat 14gambling from a home dock in the city of East St. Louis; and 15one of which shall authorize riverboat gambling from a home 16dock in the City of Alton. One other license shall authorize 17riverboat gambling on the Illinois River in the City of East 18Peoria or, with Board approval, shall authorize land-based 19gambling operations anywhere within the corporate limits of 20the City of Peoria. The Board shall issue one additional 21license to become effective not earlier than March 1, 1992, 22which shall authorize riverboat gambling on the Des Plaines 23River in Will County. The Board may issue 4 additional 24licenses to become effective not earlier than March 1, 1992. 25In determining the water upon which riverboats will operate, 26the Board shall consider the economic benefit which riverboat   SB2723- 7 -LRB104 15890 LNS 29116 b1gambling confers on the State, and shall seek to ensure assure 2that all regions of the State share in the economic benefits of 3riverboat gambling.4    In granting all licenses, the Board may give favorable 5consideration to economically depressed areas of the State, to 6applicants presenting plans which provide for significant 7economic development over a large geographic area, and to 8applicants who currently operate non-gambling riverboats in 9Illinois. The Board shall review all applications for owners 10licenses, and shall inform each applicant of the Board's 11decision. The Board may grant an owners license to an 12applicant that has not submitted the highest license bid, but 13if it does not select the highest bidder, the Board shall issue 14a written decision explaining why another applicant was 15selected and identifying the factors set forth in this Section 16that favored the winning bidder. The fee for issuance or 17renewal of a license pursuant to this subsection (e) shall be 18$250,000.19    (e-5) In addition to licenses authorized under subsection 20(e) of this Section:21        (1) the Board may issue one owners license authorizing 22    the conduct of casino gambling in the City of Chicago;23        (2) the Board may issue one owners license authorizing 24    the conduct of riverboat gambling in the City of Danville;25        (3) the Board may issue one owners license authorizing 26    the conduct of riverboat gambling in the City of Waukegan;  SB2723- 8 -LRB104 15890 LNS 29116 b1        (4) the Board may issue one owners license authorizing 2    the conduct of riverboat gambling in the City of Rockford;3        (5) the Board may issue one owners license authorizing 4    the conduct of riverboat gambling in a municipality that 5    is wholly or partially located in one of the following 6    townships of Cook County: Bloom, Bremen, Calumet, Rich, 7    Thornton, or Worth Township; and8        (6) the Board may issue one owners license authorizing 9    the conduct of riverboat gambling in the unincorporated 10    area of Williamson County adjacent to the Big Muddy River.11    Except for the license authorized under paragraph (1), 12each application for a license pursuant to this subsection 13(e-5) shall be submitted to the Board no later than 120 days 14after June 28, 2019 (the effective date of Public Act 101-31). 15All applications for a license under this subsection (e-5) 16shall include the nonrefundable application fee and the 17nonrefundable background investigation fee as provided in 18subsection (d) of Section 6 of this Act. In the event that an 19applicant submits an application for a license pursuant to 20this subsection (e-5) prior to June 28, 2019 (the effective 21date of Public Act 101-31), such applicant shall submit the 22nonrefundable application fee and background investigation fee 23as provided in subsection (d) of Section 6 of this Act no later 24than 6 months after June 28, 2019 (the effective date of Public 25Act 101-31). 26    The Board shall consider issuing a license pursuant to   SB2723- 9 -LRB104 15890 LNS 29116 b1paragraphs (1) through (6) of this subsection only after the 2corporate authority of the municipality or the county board of 3the county in which the riverboat or casino shall be located 4has certified to the Board the following:5        (i) that the applicant has negotiated with the 6    corporate authority or county board in good faith;7        (ii) that the applicant and the corporate authority or 8    county board have mutually agreed on the permanent 9    location of the riverboat or casino;10        (iii) that the applicant and the corporate authority 11    or county board have mutually agreed on the temporary 12    location of the riverboat or casino;13        (iv) that the applicant and the corporate authority or 14    the county board have mutually agreed on the percentage of 15    revenues that will be shared with the municipality or 16    county, if any;17        (v) that the applicant and the corporate authority or 18    county board have mutually agreed on any zoning, 19    licensing, public health, or other issues that are within 20    the jurisdiction of the municipality or county;21        (vi) that the corporate authority or county board has 22    passed a resolution or ordinance in support of the 23    riverboat or casino in the municipality or county; 24        (vii) that the applicant for a license under paragraph 25    (1) has made a public presentation concerning its casino 26    proposal; and  SB2723- 10 -LRB104 15890 LNS 29116 b1        (viii) that the applicant for a license under 2    paragraph (1) has prepared a summary of its casino 3    proposal and such summary has been posted on a public 4    website of the municipality or the county. 5    At least 7 days before the corporate authority of a 6municipality or county board of the county submits a 7certification to the Board concerning items (i) through (viii) 8of this subsection, it shall hold a public hearing to discuss 9items (i) through (viii), as well as any other details 10concerning the proposed riverboat or casino in the 11municipality or county. The corporate authority or county 12board must subsequently memorialize the details concerning the 13proposed riverboat or casino in a resolution that must be 14adopted by a majority of the corporate authority or county 15board before any certification is sent to the Board. The Board 16shall not alter, amend, change, or otherwise interfere with 17any agreement between the applicant and the corporate 18authority of the municipality or county board of the county 19regarding the location of any temporary or permanent facility. 20    In addition, within 10 days after June 28, 2019 (the 21effective date of Public Act 101-31), the Board, with consent 22and at the expense of the City of Chicago, shall select and 23retain the services of a nationally recognized casino gaming 24feasibility consultant. Within 45 days after June 28, 2019 25(the effective date of Public Act 101-31), the consultant 26shall prepare and deliver to the Board a study concerning the   SB2723- 11 -LRB104 15890 LNS 29116 b1feasibility of, and the ability to finance, a casino in the 2City of Chicago. The feasibility study shall be delivered to 3the Mayor of the City of Chicago, the Governor, the President 4of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of 5Representatives. Ninety days after receipt of the feasibility 6study, the Board shall make a determination, based on the 7results of the feasibility study, whether to recommend to the 8General Assembly that the terms of the license under paragraph 9(1) of this subsection (e-5) should be modified. The Board may 10begin accepting applications for the owners license under 11paragraph (1) of this subsection (e-5) upon the determination 12to issue such an owners license. 13    In addition, prior to the Board issuing the owners license 14authorized under paragraph (4) of this subsection (e-5), an 15impact study shall be completed to determine what location in 16the city will provide the greater impact to the region, 17including the creation of jobs and the generation of tax 18revenue. 19    (e-10) The licenses authorized under subsection (e-5) of 20this Section shall be issued within 12 months after the date 21the license application is submitted. If the Board does not 22issue the licenses within that time period, then the Board 23shall give a written explanation to the applicant as to why it 24has not reached a determination and when it reasonably expects 25to make a determination. The fee for the issuance or renewal of 26a license issued pursuant to this subsection (e-10) shall be   SB2723- 12 -LRB104 15890 LNS 29116 b1$250,000. Additionally, a licensee located outside of Cook 2County shall pay a minimum initial fee of $17,500 per gaming 3position, and a licensee located in Cook County shall pay a 4minimum initial fee of $30,000 per gaming position. The 5initial fees payable under this subsection (e-10) shall be 6deposited into the Rebuild Illinois Projects Fund. If at any 7point after June 1, 2020 there are no pending applications for 8a license under subsection (e-5) and not all licenses 9authorized under subsection (e-5) have been issued, then the 10Board shall reopen the license application process for those 11licenses authorized under subsection (e-5) that have not been 12issued. The Board shall follow the licensing process provided 13in subsection (e-5) with all time frames tied to the last date 14of a final order issued by the Board under subsection (e-5) 15rather than the effective date of the amendatory Act.16    (e-15) Each licensee of a license authorized under 17subsection (e-5) of this Section shall pay a $15,000,000 18reconciliation fee upon issuance of an owners license. Each 19licensee authorized under subsection (e-5) shall make a 20reconciliation payment 3 years after the date the licensee 21begins operating in an amount equal to 75% of the adjusted 22gross receipts for the most lucrative consecutive 12-month 23period of operations, minus an amount equal to (i) the initial 24payment per gaming position paid by the specific licensee and 25(ii) the $15,000,000 reconciliation fee. Each licensee shall 26pay a $15,000,000 reconciliation fee upon issuance of an   SB2723- 13 -LRB104 15890 LNS 29116 b1owners license. If this calculation results in a negative 2amount, then the licensee is not entitled to any reimbursement 3of fees previously paid. This reconciliation payment may be 4made in installments over a period of no more than 6 years. 5    All payments by licensees under this subsection (e-15) 6shall be deposited into the Rebuild Illinois Projects Fund.7    (e-20) In addition to any other revocation powers granted 8to the Board under this Act, the Board may revoke the owners 9license of a licensee which fails to begin conducting gambling 10within 15 months of receipt of the Board's approval of the 11application if the Board determines that license revocation is 12in the best interests of the State.13    (f) The first 10 owners licenses issued under this Act 14shall permit the holder to own up to 2 riverboats and equipment 15thereon for a period of 3 years after the effective date of the 16license. Holders of the first 10 owners licenses must pay the 17annual license fee for each of the 3 years during which they 18are authorized to own riverboats.19    (g) Upon the termination, expiration, or revocation of 20each of the first 10 licenses, which shall be issued for a 213-year period, all licenses are renewable annually upon 22payment of the fee and a determination by the Board that the 23licensee continues to meet all of the requirements of this Act 24and the Board's rules. However, for licenses renewed on or 25after June 10, 2021 (the effective date of Public Act 102-13) 26this amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly, renewal   SB2723- 14 -LRB104 15890 LNS 29116 b1shall be for a period of 4 years. 2    (h) An owners license, except for an owners license issued 3under subsection (e-5) of this Section, shall entitle the 4licensee to own up to 2 riverboats. 5    An owners licensee of a casino or riverboat that is 6located in the City of Chicago pursuant to paragraph (1) of 7subsection (e-5) of this Section shall limit the number of 8gaming positions to 4,000 for such owner. An owners licensee 9authorized under subsection (e) or paragraph (2), (3), (4), or 10(5) of subsection (e-5) of this Section shall limit the number 11of gaming positions to 2,000 for any such owners license. An 12owners licensee authorized under paragraph (6) of subsection 13(e-5) of this Section shall limit the number of gaming 14positions to 1,200 for such owner. The initial fee for each 15gaming position obtained on or after June 28, 2019 (the 16effective date of Public Act 101-31) shall be a minimum of 17$17,500 for licensees not located in Cook County and a minimum 18of $30,000 for licensees located in Cook County, in addition 19to the reconciliation payment, as set forth in subsection 20(e-15) of this Section. The fees under this subsection (h) 21shall be deposited into the Rebuild Illinois Projects Fund. 22The fees under this subsection (h) that are paid by an owners 23licensee authorized under subsection (e) shall be paid by July 241, 2021.25    Each owners licensee under subsection (e) of this Section 26shall reserve its gaming positions within 30 days after June   SB2723- 15 -LRB104 15890 LNS 29116 b128, 2019 (the effective date of Public Act 101-31). The Board 2may grant an extension to this 30-day period, provided that 3the owners licensee submits a written request and explanation 4as to why it is unable to reserve its positions within the 530-day period.6    Each owners licensee under subsection (e-5) of this 7Section shall reserve its gaming positions within 30 days 8after issuance of its owners license. The Board may grant an 9extension to this 30-day period, provided that the owners 10licensee submits a written request and explanation as to why 11it is unable to reserve its positions within the 30-day 12period.13    A licensee may operate both of its riverboats 14concurrently, provided that the total number of gaming 15positions on both riverboats does not exceed the limit 16established pursuant to this subsection. Riverboats licensed 17to operate on the Mississippi River and the Illinois River 18south of Marshall County shall have an authorized capacity of 19at least 500 persons. Any other riverboat licensed under this 20Act shall have an authorized capacity of at least 400 persons.21    (h-5) An owners licensee who conducted gambling operations 22prior to January 1, 2012 and obtains positions pursuant to 23Public Act 101-31 shall make a reconciliation payment 3 years 24after any additional gaming positions begin operating in an 25amount equal to 75% of the owners licensee's average gross 26receipts for the most lucrative 12-month period of operations   SB2723- 16 -LRB104 15890 LNS 29116 b1minus an amount equal to the initial fee that the owners 2licensee paid per additional gaming position. For purposes of 3this subsection (h-5), "average gross receipts" means (i) the 4increase in adjusted gross receipts for the most lucrative 512-month period of operations over the adjusted gross receipts 6for 2019, multiplied by (ii) the percentage derived by 7dividing the number of additional gaming positions that an 8owners licensee had obtained by the total number of gaming 9positions operated by the owners licensee. If this calculation 10results in a negative amount, then the owners licensee is not 11entitled to any reimbursement of fees previously paid. This 12reconciliation payment may be made in installments over a 13period of no more than 6 years. These reconciliation payments 14shall be deposited into the Rebuild Illinois Projects Fund. 15    (i) A licensed owner is authorized to apply to the Board 16for and, if approved therefor, to receive all licenses from 17the Board necessary for the operation of a riverboat or 18casino, including a liquor license, a license to prepare and 19serve food for human consumption, and other necessary 20licenses. All use, occupation, and excise taxes which apply to 21the sale of food and beverages in this State and all taxes 22imposed on the sale or use of tangible personal property apply 23to such sales aboard the riverboat or in the casino.24    (j) The Board may issue or re-issue a license authorizing 25a riverboat to dock in a municipality or approve a relocation 26under Section 11.2 only if, prior to the issuance or   SB2723- 17 -LRB104 15890 LNS 29116 b1re-issuance of the license or approval, the governing body of 2the municipality in which the riverboat will dock has by a 3majority vote approved the docking of riverboats in the 4municipality. The Board may issue or re-issue a license 5authorizing a riverboat to dock in areas of a county outside 6any municipality or approve a relocation under Section 11.2 7only if, prior to the issuance or re-issuance of the license or 8approval, the governing body of the county has by a majority 9vote approved of the docking of riverboats within such areas.10    (k) An owners licensee may conduct land-based gambling 11operations upon approval by the Board and payment of a fee of 12$250,000, which shall be deposited into the State Gaming Fund. 13    (l) An owners licensee may conduct gaming at a temporary 14facility pending the construction of a permanent facility or 15the remodeling or relocation of an existing facility to 16accommodate gaming participants for up to 24 months after the 17temporary facility begins to conduct gaming. Upon request by 18an owners licensee and upon a showing of good cause by the 19owners licensee: (i) for a licensee authorized under paragraph 20(3) of subsection (e-5), the Board shall extend the period 21during which the licensee may conduct gaming at a temporary 22facility by up to 30 months; and (ii) for all other licensees, 23the Board shall extend the period during which the licensee 24may conduct gaming at a temporary facility by up to 12 months. 25The Board shall make rules concerning the conduct of gaming 26from temporary facilities.  SB2723- 18 -LRB104 15890 LNS 29116 b1(Source: P.A. 102-13, eff. 6-10-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 2103-574, eff. 12-8-23; revised 6-26-25.)